Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.0195

Disciplinary reports—Confidentiality—Immunity.

(1) The contents of any report filed under RCW 18.130.070 shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW, except that it may be reviewed (a) by the licensee involved or his or her counsel or authorized representative who may submit any additional exculpatory or explanatory statements or other information, which statements or other information shall be included in the file, or (b) by a representative of the commission, or investigator thereof, who has been assigned to review the activities of a licensed physician.

Upon a determination that a report is without merit, the commission's records may be purged of information relating to the report.

(2) Every individual, medical association, medical society, hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, medical service bureau, health insurance carrier or agent, professional liability insurance carrier, professional standards review organization, agency of the federal, state, or local government, or the entity established by RCW 18.71.300 and its officers, agents, and employees are immune from civil liability, whether direct or derivative, for providing information to the commission under RCW 18.130.070, or for which an individual health care provider has immunity under the provisions of RCW 4.24.240, 4.24.250, or 4.24.260.

[ 2007 c 273 s 24; 2005 c 274 s 227; 1998 c 132 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 328; 1986 c 259 s 117; 1979 ex.s. c 111 s 15. Formerly RCW 18.72.265.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2007 c 273: See RCW 70.230.900 and 70.230.901.

Finding—Intent—1998 c 132: "The legislature finds that the self-imposed license surcharge on physician licenses to fund a program to help physicians with chemical dependency or mental illness is not being fully spent on that program. It is the intent of the legislature that the program be fully funded and that funds collected into the impaired physician account be spent only on the program." [ 1998 c 132 s 1.]

Severability—1998 c 132: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1998 c 132 s 15.]

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.